Tennessee, session 114, HB0881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-409, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) Notwithstanding this part or a rule to the contrary, the department shall not
require an installer of subsurface sewage disposal systems who is in good standing with
the department to pay a renewal fee as a condition to renewing the installer's septic
system installer license.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0881
001699
- 1 -